Washington statutes.
RCW 6.26.020

Issuance of writ—Bond—Fee.

In all cases of garnishment before judgment, before the writ shall issue, the plaintiff shall pay the fee described in RCW 6.27.060 and shall execute and file with the clerk a bond with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the clerk of the court issuing the writ, payable to the defendant in the suit, in double the amount of the debt claimed therein, or such other amount as the court shall fix, conditioned that the plaintiff will prosecute the suit without delay and pay all damages and costs that may be adjudged against him or her for wrongfully suing out such garnishment.

[ 1988 c 231 s 19; 1987 c 442 s 902; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 3. Formerly RCW 7.33.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.